Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Miscellaneous Procurement Provisions
45A.695.
Personal service contract procedures — Tax incentive agreements.

Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, no one shall begin work on a personal service contract entered into by any contracting body or incur expenditures under a tax incentive agreement until notification of the personal service contract or tax incentive agreement is filed with the committee. Each personal service contract shall have a cancellation clause not to exceed thirty (30) days notice to the contractee.

Each personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, and memorandum of agreement shall be filed with the committee prior to the effective date and shall be accompanied by a completed proof of necessity form as established by the committee by promulgation of an administrative regulation, or equivalent information if submitted electronically. The proof of necessity form shall document:

The need for the service or benefit to the Commonwealth of the tax incentive agreement;

For personal service contracts and memoranda of agreement, the unavailability of state personnel or the nonfeasibility of utilizing state personnel to perform the service;

The total projected cost of the contract or agreement and source of funding;

The total projected duration of the contract or tax incentive agreement;

Payment information, in detail;

In the case of memoranda of agreement or similar device, the reason for exchanging resources or responsibilities; and

Such other information as the committee deems appropriate.

Adequate notice of the need for a personal service contract shall be given by the contracting body through a request for proposals. The request for proposals shall describe the services required, list the type of information and data required of each offeror, state the relative importance of particular qualifications, and include the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

.

The head of the contracting body or his or her designee may conduct discussions with any offeror who has submitted a proposal to determine the offeror’s qualifications for further consideration. Discussions shall not disclose any information derived from proposals submitted by other offerors.

Award shall be made to the offeror determined by the head of the contracting body, or his or her designee, to be the best qualified of all offerors based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals and the negotiation of fair and reasonable compensation. If compensation cannot be agreed upon with the best qualified offeror and if proposals were submitted by one (1) or more other offerors determined to be qualified, negotiations may be conducted with the other offeror or offerors in the order of their respective qualification ranking. In this case, the contract may be awarded to the next best ranked offeror for a fair and reasonable compensation. All determinations of the qualification rankings of offerors by the head of the contracting body or a designee of the officer based on evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals shall be made in writing. Written documentation shall be maintained concerning the final results of negotiation with each vendor and reasoning as to why each vendor was chosen.

The committee shall maintain a record or have readily accessible records of the date on which each personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, and memorandum of agreement was received and shall maintain or have access to electronic or paper files on all personal service contracts, tax incentive agreements, and memoranda of agreement. Except for records exempt from inspection under KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, all personal service contracts, tax incentive agreements, and memoranda of agreement shall be made available for public inspection.

Payment on personal service contracts, tax incentive agreements, and memoranda of agreement submitted to the committee for approval shall not be made for services rendered or projects undertaken after committee disapproval, unless the decision of the committee is overridden by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or agency head, if the agency has been granted delegation authority by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. All personal service contracts, tax incentive agreements, and memoranda of agreement shall contain a provision that stipulates that payments on personal service contracts and memoranda of agreement shall not be authorized for services rendered after committee disapproval, unless the decision of the committee is overridden by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or agency head, if the agency has been granted delegation authority.

In the event of a governmental emergency as defined under KRS

45A.690

, work may begin prior to filing notification of the personal service contract with the committee, if the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his designee determines that the time involved in the normal review process would be detrimental to the Commonwealth’s ability to act or procure the services and the normal process will not accommodate the governmental emergency. Payment shall not be made until written notification and explanation of the reasons for this action are forwarded to the committee.

If a governmental emergency exists as defined under KRS

45A.690

and work is authorized to begin on a personal service contact immediately, a copy of a statement, approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his designee, setting forth in detail the nature of the emergency shall be filed with the committee, along with a copy of the personal service contract.

No payment shall be made on any personal service contract unless the individual, firm, partnership, or corporation awarded the personal service contract submits its invoice for payment on a form established by the committee.

Invoices shall be submitted every ninety (90) days, unless the personal service contract specifies a different submission time period.

Separate invoices shall be submitted for each distinct matter covered by the personal service contract, and shall be signed by the individual responsible for that matter.

Each invoice shall contain the following information:

A description of the matter covered by the invoice;

The date each service was performed;

A full description of each service;

The name and title of each individual who worked on the matter, and the time the individual spent on the matter;

The subject matter and recipient of any correspondence;

A full description of any work product produced, designating the way in which the work product is associated with the matter being invoiced;

The hourly rate for each individual working on the matter, and the total charge for that individual for each matter invoiced;

An itemized list of all disbursements to be reimbursed by the state for each matter invoiced;

The total charge for each matter;

The combined total for services and disbursements for the billing period;

The tax identification number of the entity awarded the personal service contract; and

An indication on each invoice of whether or not the invoice is final.

The issuance of an invoice to the Commonwealth constitutes an affirmation by the individual, firm, partnership, or corporation awarded the personal service contract that the invoice truly and accurately represents work actually performed and expenses actually incurred.

The head of the contracting body shall approve the invoice, indicating that the charges in the invoice reflect the value of the work performed, and all recorded costs and disbursements were reasonably and necessarily incurred in connection with the matter invoiced.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 55, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 33, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 120, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 486, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 49, effective June 26, 2009; 2010, ch. 55, § 4, effective April 5, 2010; 2010, ch. 162, §
15, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/10). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 55 and 162 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 120 and 486 which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 486, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

45A.700.
Certain personal service contracts in aggregate amounts of $10,000 or less exempt from routine review — Memoranda of agreement and price contracts of $50,000 or less exempt from routine review — Review requirement for amendments.

Personal service contracts in aggregate amounts of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less during any one (1) fiscal year shall be exempt from routine review by the committee and shall be filed with the committee not more than thirty (30) days after their effective date for informational purposes only. The committee shall examine all personal service contracts in aggregate amounts of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less submitted more than thirty (30) days after the effective date. The committee may periodically examine the informational copies of personal service contracts in aggregate amounts of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less and may request agency participation in discussions relative to their contracts or payments. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to price contracts for personal services.

Memoranda of agreement and price contracts for personal services in aggregate amounts of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less during in any one fiscal year shall be exempt from routine review by the committee and shall be filed with the committee not more than thirty (30) days after their effective date for informational purposes only. The committee shall examine all memoranda of agreement and price contracts for personal services in aggregate amounts of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less submitted more than thirty (30) days after the effective date. The committee may periodically examine memoranda of agreement and price contracts for personal services in aggregate amounts of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less and may request agency participation in discussions relative to their agreements or payments.

If a personal service contract of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) is amended to the extent the amended total of the contract exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per fiscal year per contractor, the amended contract shall be placed on the agenda for the committee’s routine review. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to price contracts for personal services.

If a memorandum of agreement or price contract for personal services of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) is amended to the extent the amended total of the agreement or contract exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per fiscal year per governmental body, the amended agreement or contract shall be placed on the agenda for the committee’s routine review.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 60, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 486, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.705.
Government Contract Review Committee — Membership — Duties — Meeting — Vote required to act.

There is hereby created a permanent committee of the Legislative Research Commission to be known as the Government Contract Review Committee. The committee shall be composed of eight (8) members appointed as follows: three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; one (1) member of the minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the Senate; three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and one (1) member of the minority party in the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the House of Representatives. Members shall serve for terms of two (2) years, and the members appointed from each chamber shall elect one (1) member from their chamber to serve as co-chair. Any vacancy that may occur in the membership of the committee shall be filled by the appointing authority who made the original appointment.

On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be canceled by agreement of both co-chairs. The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for committee meeting agendas and presiding at committee meetings. A majority of the entire membership of the Government Contract Review Committee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the committee shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership. The members of the committee shall be compensated for attending meetings, as provided in KRS 7.090(3).

Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the committee shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of KRS 7.090(4) and (5).

All proposed personal service contracts, tax incentive agreements, and memoranda of agreement received by the Legislative Research Commission shall be submitted to the committee to:

Examine the stated need for the service or benefit to the Commonwealth of the motion picture or entertainment production;

Examine whether the service could or should be performed by state personnel, for personal service contracts and memoranda of agreement;

Examine the amount and duration of the contract or agreement; and

Examine the appropriateness of any exchange of resources or responsibilities.

If the committee determines that the contract service or agreement, other than an emergency contract approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, is not needed or inappropriate, the motion picture or entertainment production is not beneficial or is inappropriate, the service could or should be performed by state personnel, the amount or duration is excessive, or the exchange of resources or responsibilities are inappropriate, the committee shall attach a written notation of the reasons for its disapproval or objection to the personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement and shall return the personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee. The committee shall act on a personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement submitted to the Legislative Research Commission within forty-five (45) days of the date received.

Upon receipt of the committee’s disapproval or objection to a personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee shall determine whether the personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement shall:

Be revised to comply with the objections of the committee;

Be canceled and, if applicable, payment allowed for services rendered under the contract or amendment; or

Be appealed within ten (10) days to the State Treasurer, who shall make a final determination within ten (10) days of receipt of the appeal of whether the personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement shall:

Be revised to comply with the objection of the committee;

Be canceled and, if applicable, payment allowed for services already rendered under the contract or amendment; or

Remain effective as originally submitted.

Paragraph (a)3. of this subsection shall not apply to any personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement insofar as the contract or agreement is based upon the enumerated powers specifically granted to the Governor pursuant to Sections 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, and 80 of the Constitution of Kentucky, or any subsequent amendments to the Constitution of Kentucky which specifically designate enumerated powers to the Governor.

Contracting bodies shall make annual reports to the committee not later than December 1 of each year. The committee shall establish reporting procedures for contracting bodies related to personal service contracts, tax incentive agreements, and memoranda of agreement submitted by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 17, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 120, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 486, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 185, § 5, effective March 31, 2003; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 50, effective June 26, 2009; 2021 ch. 151, § 3, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 205, § 1, effective April 14, 2022.

45A.710.
Personal service contracts for advertising, promotional, or public relations services. [Repealed.]

45A.715.
Certain contracts by Department of Revenue prohibited.

The Department of Revenue shall not enter into any personal service contract for the collection of revenue for the state or for the prosecution of any action or proceeding for the collection of delinquent taxes owed by a resident and the assessment of omitted property owned by a resident.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 19, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 85, § 74, effective June 20, 2005.

45A.717.
Contingency fee for legal services under personal service contract — Powers and duties of head of contracting body — Review of responses to requests for proposals — Limits on contingency fee — Payment only from money received pursuant to judgment or settlement — Standard addendum to contract — Posting on Web sites — Records — Report — Common law authority abrogated.

The head of a contracting body, which includes constitutional officers, shall not award a personal service contract for legal services that provides for payment by contingency fee unless, prior to the award, the head of the contracting body determines in writing:

The contingency fee is both cost-effective and in the public interest;

Sufficient and appropriate legal and financial resources do not exist within the contracting body;

The amount of time and labor required to perform the requested services;

The novelty, complexity, and difficulty of the matter;

The skill required to perform the requested services properly;

The geographic area where the legal services are to be provided; and

The experience desired for the particular kind of legal services to be provided.

The head of the contracting body or his or her designee shall participate in reviewing and evaluating the responses to the requests for proposals and discussions with offerors.

A contingency fee shall not exceed:

Twenty percent (20%) of the amount recovered up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000);

Fifteen percent (15%) of the amount recovered between ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000);

Ten percent (10%) of the amount recovered between fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) and twenty million dollars ($20,000,000); and

Five percent (5%) of the amount recovered of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) or more.

A contingency fee shall not exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), regardless of the number of actions or proceedings or the number of attorneys or law firms involved in the matter, and exclusive of any costs and expenses provided for by the contract and actually incurred by the legal services contractor.

A contingency fee shall be payable only from money that is actually received pursuant to a judgment or settlement agreement, and any judgment or settlement funds shall be disbursed in accordance with KRS

48.005

.

During the contract period and any extension:

The head of the contracting body or his or her designee shall retain control over the course and conduct of the case and shall retain veto authority over any decision made by the contract attorney;

The head of the contracting body or his or her designee with authority over the contract shall:

Attend all settlement conferences;

Be personally involved in overseeing the litigation; and

Have exclusive decision-making power regarding any settlement of the matter for which the contract was entered; and

Any opposing party to the matter for which the contract was entered into may directly contact the head of the contracting body or his or her designee with authority over the contract, without having to notify the contract attorney.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall develop a standard addendum to be added to each personal service contract for legal services to include the terms of this section.

Within five (5) business days after the contract award, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall post on its Web site each personal service contract for legal services that provides for payment by contingency fee and the accompanying written determinations described in subsection (1) of this section. The contract and accompanying determinations shall remain on the Web site during the duration of the contract and any extension.

Any payment of contingency fees shall be posted on the contracting body’s Web site within fifteen (15) days after the payment of such contingency fees to the legal services contractor and shall remain posted on the Web site for at least three hundred sixty-five (365) days.

In addition to the information required of each contingency fee contract by the Kentucky Model Procurement Code and KRS

45A.695

, a contractor awarded a personal service contract for legal services that provides for payment by contingency fee shall maintain detailed current records, including documentation of:

Expenses;

Disbursements;

Charges and credits;

Underlying receipts and invoices; and

Any other financial transactions that concern the attorney services rendered under the contract.

All records described in this subsection shall become public records subject to KRS

61.870

to

61.884

after a judgment or agreement is entered in the case and all appeals have been exhausted, but shall not be public records until that time.

Any information that is subject to an evidentiary privilege and is contained within any record described in this subsection shall not be a public record. The privileged information shall be redacted before any public disclosure of the record.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet and the contracting body shall submit a joint report to the Government Contract Review Committee by September 1 of each year identifying all contingency fee contracts for legal services:

Awarded in the previous fiscal year;

Active in the previous fiscal year, but awarded in prior fiscal years; or

Concluded in the previous fiscal year.

For each contract, the report shall include:

The written determinations made under subsection (1) of this section;

Any determination made that the contract was not to be procured through the request for proposal process; and

Any determination made that the contract may be entered into despite a finding of disapproval by the committee.

In addition, the report shall describe:

The name of the attorney or law firm with whom the contract was made;

The nature and status of the legal matter that is the subject of the contract;

The name of the parties to the legal matter that is the subject of the contract;

The amount of recovery, if any; and

The amount of the contingency fee paid, if any.

The common law authority of any duly elected statewide constitutional officer is specifically abrogated to the extent it is inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

45A.720.
Contract for executioner not subject to KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725.

Agreements with an individual to provide the services of executioner for the Department of Corrections shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

. The identity of an individual performing the services of executioner shall remain confidential and shall not be considered as public record for the purposes of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 20, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.725.
Authority of committee to establish policies and procedures relating to manner and form of notification and documentation to accompany personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement.

The Government Contract Review Committee may establish policies and procedures concerning the manner and form of notification and the documentation to accompany the proposed personal service contract, tax incentive agreement, or memorandum of agreement.

Nothing in this code shall prohibit the committee from accepting personal service contracts, tax incentive agreement, or memoranda of agreement through the use of electronic instrumentalities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 496, § 21, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 486, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 51, effective June 26, 2009.